Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1701
Legislative Oversight Committee; established; duties; members.

(1) The Legislative Oversight Committee is hereby established as a special legislative committee to exercise the authority and perform the duties provided for in the Legislative Performance Audit Act, the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act, and the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act. The committee shall be composed of the Speaker of the Legislature, the chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature, the chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature, and four other members of the Legislature to be chosen by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council. The executive board shall ensure that the Legislative Oversight Committee includes adequate geographic representation. The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee shall be elected by a majority vote of the committee.

(2) For purposes of tax incentive performance audits authorized under the Legislative Performance Audit Act, the committee shall also include as nonvoting members the chairperson of the Revenue Committee of the Legislature or his or her designee and one other member of the Revenue Committee, as selected by the Revenue Committee.

(3) The Legislative Oversight Committee shall be subject to all rules prescribed by the Legislature. The committee shall be reconstituted at the beginning of each Legislature and shall meet as needed.

Laws 2025, LB298, § 22.

Legislative Performance Audit Act, see section 50-1201.

Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act, see section 50-1801.

Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act, see section 50-1901.